Alaska, session 34, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 24.20.020 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 24.20.020. Membership. The legislative council is composed of the 06 president of the senate and six other senators appointed by the president, and the 07 speaker of the house of representatives and six other representatives appointed by the 08 speaker. The membership from each house shall include at least one member from the 09 minority [EACH OF THE TWO MAJOR POLITICAL PARTIES]. The appointing 10 authority in each house shall make and announce the appointment or reappointment of 11 members of the council within 15 days after the convening of the first regular session 12 of each legislature. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 24.20.161 is amended to read: 14 Sec. 24.20.161. Membership. The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee is 01 composed of 10 members: the chairs [CHAIRMEN] of the senate and house finance 02 committees, [;] one member selected from each of the senate and house finance 03 committees and appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house, 04 respectively, [;] and three members appointed from each house by the respective 05 presiding officer. The chair [CHAIRMAN] of the finance committee may choose not 06 to serve on the committee. If this occurs, the presiding officer of the appropriate house 07 shall appoint a replacement from the finance committee. The membership from each 08 house shall include at least one member from the minority [EACH OF THE TWO 09 MAJOR POLITICAL PARTIES]. The committee shall select its own chair 10 [CHAIRMAN]. 11 * Sec. 3. AS 24.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 12 Article 4. General Provisions. 13 Sec. 24.20.700. Definition. In this chapter, "minority" means a group of 14 members who have organized and elected a minority leader and who constitute at least 15 25 percent of the total house membership. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.